Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Violations and Penalties.

Sec. 23.05.270.
Violations by employer.

It is a violation of this chapter for an employer to

hinder or unnecessarily delay the department in the enforcement of this chapter;

refuse to admit an authorized representative of the department to a place of employment;

falsify or fail to keep a record required under provisions of this chapter, or refuse to make the records accessible or to furnish a sworn statement of the records; or

refuse to give information required for the enforcement of this chapter, upon demand, to the department.

History.

(§ 43-1-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.280.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order made under this chapter upon conviction is punishable for each offense by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.
Each day’s continuance of a violation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 43-1-12 ACLA 1949; § 6 ch 148 SLA 1957)